Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-5707.02
Data center, defined.

Data center means computers,
supporting equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software
that are designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination
of data and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities
or interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply, communication
and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and fire suppression,
and any building housing the foregoing. A data center also includes a facility
described in this section for the co-location of computers.

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 3.
March 8, 2012